Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-403
Public utility districts; creation; extension or enlargement of service; notice requirements; protests.

Upon the passage of an ordinance or resolution, as the case may be, creating a water main district, gas main district, or other public utility service district or ordering the extension or enlargement of a water main, gas main, or other public utility service through such district, it shall be the duty of the city or village council which passed the ordinance or of the other public utility authority which passed such resolution creating such district to cause a notice to be published in the official paper of the city or village, as the case may be, or in the principal city within the metropolitan utilities district, addressed generally to the owners of the real estate within the water main, gas main, or other public utility district, notifying them of the creation of the district and of the ordering of the extension or enlargement of the water main, gas main, or other public utility service within such district and further notifying the owners of the real estate that they have thirty days from and after such publication to file with such city council or other public authority, as the case may be, their written protest against the creation of the district and of the extension or enlargement of the water main, gas main, or other public utility service so ordered.

Laws 1921, c. 110, § 3, p. 386;

C.S.1922, § 4477;

C.S.1929, § 18-1003;

R.S.1943, § 18-403;

Laws 1992, LB 746, § 64.

In absence of notice giving owners of real estate thirty days to file written protest, city cannot levy special assessments for water main extension. Matzke v. City of Seward, 193 Neb. 211, 226 N.W.2d 340 (1975).